Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 5. Claim Procedure
§ 27-14-503.
Statute of limitations.

A payment for benefits involving an injury which is the result of a single brief occurrence rather than occurring over a substantial period of time shall not be made unless in addition to the proper and timely filing of the injury reports, an application or claim for benefits is filed within one (1) year after the date the injury occurred or for injuries not readily apparent, within one (1) year after discovery of the injury by the employee. The injury report is not a claim for benefits.

The right of compensation for an injury which occurs over a substantial period of time is barred unless a claim for benefits is filed within one (1) year after a diagnosis of injury is first communicated to the employee, or within three (3) years from the date of last injurious workplace exposure to the condition causing the injury, whichever occurs last, excluding injury caused by ionizing radiation to which the three (3) year limitation does not apply. If death results from ionizing radiation within one (1) year after a diagnosis of the medical condition is first communicated to the employee or if death occurs without the communication of a diagnosis to the employee, a claim shall be filed within one (1) year after the date of death.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 229, § 1; ch. 264, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, §§ 1, 2.

Section governs injury resulting from single occurrence. —

A worker's compensation claim was not governed by §

27-14-603

(burden of proof where injuries occur over substantial period of time). The evidence was uncontradicted that the claimant was able to perform hard physical labor both before and after receiving the injury in question. The injury was the result of a single brief occurrence (muscle spasm) and did not occur over a substantial period of time. Dougherty v. J.W. Williams, Inc., 820 P.2d 553,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1991).

Term “injury”

from the date of occurrence of which the mandatory time limitation imposed upon the employee to file his claim for compensation commences to run means a compensable injury under the law. Baldwin v. Scullion, 50 Wyo. 508, 62 P.2d 531,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1936).

The term “injury” as it relates to the limitation period for the filing of claims means “compensable injury.” Bemis v. Texaco, Inc., 401 P.2d 708,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1965).

The concept of a compensable injury should be the same for purposes of both statutes (former 27-12-502 and former 27-12-503). City of Casper v. Haines, 886 P.2d 585,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1994) (decided under former §§ 27-12-502 and 27-12-503).

Injury becomes compensable when properly diagnosed. —

Employee struck in hip by falling pipe in July, 1934, who continued to work, and was told by company physician that he had arthritis but who in following January, after X-ray pictures, was told by another physician that a fragment of bone had been broken, and who filed his claim the following April 10th, was not barred by the statute, as injury was not a compensable injury until he had received correct diagnosis. Baldwin v. Scullion, 50 Wyo. 508, 62 P.2d 531,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1936).

When a correct diagnosis and prognosis of present or likely future disability is communicated to the claimant, the injury is discovered, it is compensable, and the statute of limitations begins to run. City of Casper v. Haines, 886 P.2d 585,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1994) (decided under prior law).

Compensable injury was discoverable at time of accident, and therefore employee's claim for worker's compensation benefits filed almost two years after accident was correctly denied on statute of limitations grounds; employee fell and had pain within thirty minutes, was unable to return to work for a couple of days, and was told by chiropractor he had a misaligned disk, and a reasonable person would have concluded he had suffered a compensable injury at that time. Mitchell v. State Rec. Comm'n Snowmobile Trails, 968 P.2d 37,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1998).

Injury occurs when surgical correction occurs. —

Even though the attending physician concludes that a worker has suffered an injury which may require surgical correction at some future time, he cannot be expected to submit to that procedure until it is absolutely required. In that situation, the compensable injury occurs when he is operated upon to correct the condition. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Malkowski, 741 P.2d 604,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1987).

Injury reports. —

Inasmuch as an injury report is not a claim for benefits, the period of limitations contained in this section cannot be computed from the date of filing of an injury report. Popick v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 110, 118 P.3d 993,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2005).

Commission not authorized to determine compensability of proposedsurgery. —

Medical commission lacked subject matter jurisdiction to decide whether employee's proposed back surgery would be compensable where statute presumed that claims for expenses would be made after medical services were rendered, and commission was not authorized to determine compensability of procedure when claim had not been properly submitted and procedure had not been the subject of a final determination by the division of workers' safety and compensation. Daiss v. Division of Workers' Safety & Compensation, Dep't of Empl., 965 P.2d 692,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1998).

Claimant met all of statutory time limits. —

See In re Meredith, 743 P.2d 874,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 515

(Wyo. 1987).

Applicability to injuries resulting in death. —

Limitation of time for application for compensation by injured employee is applicable to injuries resulting in death. In re Martini, 38 Wyo. 172, 265 P. 707,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1928).

Applicable to surviving parents. —

Limitation for filing claim by injured employee is applicable to claim by surviving parents. In re Martini, 38 Wyo. 172, 265 P. 707,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1928).

Limitation period begins with parentage decree entry. —

In the case of a child born out of wedlock to a worker's girl friend after the worker's death, the date of determination of parentage was the date the right to claim benefits accrued, and the statute of limitations began to run with the entry of a parentage decree. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990).

Lack of knowledge as to limitations for filing claim for compensation is no excuse

for failure to file claim within prescribed time. In re Martini, 38 Wyo. 172, 265 P. 707,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1928).

Claim for additional retrospective benefits. —

The statute of limitations under § 27-14-605(a), not subsection (a) of this section, was the proper statute to be applied where the employee had already received a favorable determination, but wanted additional retrospective benefits. Wright v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 209,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1998).

Failure to file in timely manner. —

Summary judgment was appropriate where the evidence showed the claimant knew he had suffered a compensable injury, at least by the date of the surgery and in fact when he decided, upon consultation with his physician, to have the surgery but failed to file a report of injury until five months later. Neal v. Caballo Rojo, Inc., 899 P.2d 56,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1995).

Employer's failure to file timely report not fraud or misrepresentation.—

Where there was no evidence of fraud on the employer's part, or that employer provided incorrect information to injured worker concerning worker's compensation coverage, employer's failure to timely file an injury report, in and of itself, did not rise to the level of fraud or misrepresentation necessary to invoke equitable estoppel; employer and worker's compensation division were therefore not prevented from asserting statute of limitations as a defense. Mitchell v. State Rec. Comm'n Snowmobile Trails, 968 P.2d 37,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1998).

That employee's surviving parents were in Italy was no excuse

for not filing claim for compensation in time. In re Martini, 38 Wyo. 172, 265 P. 707,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1928).

The claim and reports in compensation cases take the place of pleadings

and should be liberally construed. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co. v. Harvey, 52 Wyo. 349, 75 P.2d 1,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1938).

When “cause of action” exists. —

A “cause of action” exists in favor of an employee at the time he receives an injury arising out of an industrial accident occurring during the course of his employment. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Worker's Comp. Div. v. Barnes, 587 P.2d 214,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1978).

Filing where injury occurs over time. —

Even in the case of an injury which occurs over a period of time, the reporting requirements of §

27-14-502

are as important as the filing requirements of §

27-14-503

, perhaps more so. Neal v. Caballo Rojo, Inc., 899 P.2d 56,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1995).

“Discovery” of ionizing radiation injury. —

An injury is discovered for purposes of subsection (b), when a claimant has knowledge or when a reasonable person, under the circumstances, should have knowledge that the decedent's injuries were related to his or her employment. This necessarily implies a duty of due diligence on the part of the claimant in pursuing a claim. Olheiser v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 866 P.2d 768,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1994) (decided prior to the 1994 amendment).

Start date of limitations period. —

A benefits claim was properly denied for failure to file within the prescribed period of the statute of limitations of former § 27-12-503, which began to run as soon as claimant should reasonably have realized the serious and compensable nature of his injuries after receiving an extensive, detailed diagnosis and taking a leave from work for intolerable pain. His claim for benefits for the identical, although aggravated, injury filed four years after the diagnosis of the initial injury was denied as expired. Aanenson v. State, 842 P.2d 1077,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1992).

The statute of limitations does not begin running until the claimant has suffered a compensable injury. City of Casper v. Haines, 886 P.2d 585,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1994) (decided under prior law).

When unjust to deny compensation for injury. —

It is unjust to an employee to deny him compensation because he had tried to keep his place on an employer's payroll by doing his regular work and then found that conditions produced at the time of an accident, and which medical science could not recognize or whose final consequences it could not forecast, have gradually and ultimately produced a compensable injury. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Worker's Comp. Div. v. Barnes, 587 P.2d 214,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1978).

Sufficient evidence to support bar of claim. —

The evidence was found sufficient to support the district court's finding that the statute of limitations began to run over one year before the claim was filed. In re Robinson, 641 P.2d 195,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1982).

Claim time barred by this section. —

Where, in his own report, claimant attributed his shoulder injuries to the incident in April 1995, and there was no substantial evidence that the incident occurred later than that, claimant's report of injury on July 8, 1996, was time barred under subsection (a) as beyond the one year time period provided by law. Sherwin-Williams Co. v. Borchert, 994 P.2d 959,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. Feb. 8, 2000).

Employee's filing of three injury reports in 2003 was beyond the period of limitations found in this section because the medical records showed that the employee's self-referral to a doctor in 2002 was to obtain a second opinion concerning the diagnosis of asbestosis that the employee had already received, but even more significant was the fact that the employee filed three injury reports, which were not claims for benefits, and the period of limitations could not have been computed from the date of filing of an injury report; the statutory period passed no matter what date in 2002 was used to determine the commencement of the period, and thus the employee's petition for review should have been dismissed for lack of subject matter jurisdiction, and the appeal had to be dismissed because the court had no better jurisdiction than did the trial court. Popick v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 110, 118 P.3d 993,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2005).

Plaintiff's back injury was readily apparent to her at timeit occurred. —

See In re Grindle, 722 P.2d 166,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1986).

Disposition of single-occurrence claim not res judicata. —

Subsections (a) and (b), and its predecessors, identify two distinct types of claims: (1) claims resulting from a single brief occurrence; and (2) injuries that occur over a substantial period of time. The former is not related to the latter and cannot serve as a disposition that makes an occupational disease claim res judicata. Mattis v. Husky RMP Properties, 790 P.2d 1279,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1990).

Employer estopped from invoking limitation period followingmisleading statements as to compensation coverage. —

An employer's misleading statements, that a part-time municipal employee was not covered by worker's compensation, although unintentional, were sufficient to constitute estoppel and prevent the employer and the state of Wyoming from invoking the statute of limitations as a defense. Bauer v. State, 695 P.2d 1048,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1985), limited, Mitchell v. State Rec. Comm'n Snowmobile Trails, 968 P.2d 37,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1998).

Equitable estoppel. —

Where employer mistakenly told injured employee that she was not entitled to workers' compensation coverage, equitable estoppel applied to prevent workers' compensation division from relying on both one-year statute of limitations and ten-day accident reporting requirement. State ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Barker, 978 P.2d 1156,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1999).

Where claimant filed pursuant to § 27-14-503(a) a claim for benefits within one year of the date of her injury there was no reasonable basis for the division's final determination of untimeliness as a reason for denial of benefits, and no reasonable basis for the claims analyst to have relied upon it either when he wrote the letter of final determination to the claimant, or when he explained the timing problem over the telephone to the claimant's representative. Appleby v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 84, 47 P.3d 613,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2002).

Claim timely filed after discovery of work-related injury.—

Where claimant slipped and fell on ice while at work, he suffered from stuttering, migraines, and short term memory loss; having found no permanent injury, his doctor gave claimant an unconditional work release. Months later when claimant was having trouble doing tasks at work that used to be easy for him, claimant was sent home, never returned to work, and filed a worker's compensation claim shortly after he discovered he had a work-related injury; the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that claimant timely filed a claim for benefits pursuant to this section.
Montoya v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Montoya), 2009 WY 32, 203 P.3d 1083,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2009).

Under prior law, claim not filed within 3 years of injuriousexposure barred. —

The law in effect at the time an employee became aware that he was suffering from asbestosis, in December of 1982, was a former version of § 27-12-503, predecessor to this section, which required a claim to be filed within one year after the employee was informed of his injury, or within three years of his last injurious exposure which caused the condition, “whichever occurred first.” Therefore, the employee's claim, filed in June, 1983, was barred, since it had to be brought within three years of the last injurious exposure in 1971, or by 1974. This was so, even though the claim was filed after May 27, 1983, the effective date of the 1983 amendment to that section, which changed the language in what is now subsection (b). Wyoming Ref. Co. v. Bottjen, 695 P.2d 647,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 460

(Wyo. 1985).

Negligence action. —

Even though plaintiff's injury was suffered in the workplace, the four-year limitations period of §

1-3-105

, not this section, applied to her culpable negligence action against coworkers. James v. Montoya, 963 P.2d 993,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Olheiser v. State, ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 886 P.2d 269,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1994); Pittman v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 917 P.2d 614,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Wesaw v. Quality Maintenance, 2001 WY 17, 19 P.3d 500,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When limitation period begins to run against claim, under workmen's compensation act or occupational disease acts, for contraction of disease, 11 ALR2d 277.

Effect of fraud to toll the period for bringing actions to enforce workmen's compensation benefits, 15 ALR2d 519.

Statute of limitations applicable to action, by way of subrogation or the like, by employer or insurance carrier against third person for injury to employee, 41 ALR2d 1044.

When limitations period begins to run as to claim for disability benefits for contracting of disease under Workers' Compensation or Occupational Diseases Act, 86 ALR5th 295.

When time period commences as to claim under workers' compensation or occupational diseases act for death of worker due to contraction of disease, 100 ALR5th 567.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law §§ 53.04, 126.05D (Matthew Bender).

§ 27-14-504.
Amendment of employee's injury report.

An employee’s injury report may be amended at any time before an initial award is made in order that the employee may correctly set out the nature of his injury. Any amendment may be approved, disapproved or contested as if an original injury report.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 27-14-505.
Tolling of statute of limitations while persons under disability.

If an injured employee is mentally incompetent or a minor, or where death results from the injury and any of his dependents are mentally incompetent or minors, at the time when any right or privilege accrues under this act, no limitation of time provided for in this act shall run so long as the mentally incompetent or minor has no guardian.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Test for mental incompetence. —

The mental incompetence provision was intended to toll the statute of limitations for those individuals whose medically diagnosed mental condition is so severe as to render them unable to protect their legal right to compensation by following the statutory procedures provided in the Collicott v. State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Collicott), 2001 WY 35, 20 P.3d 1077,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2001).

Limitation period begins with parentage decree entry. —

In the case of a child born out of wedlock to a worker's girl friend after the worker's death, the date of determination of parentage was the date the right to claim benefits accrued, and the statute of limitations began to run with the entry of a parentage decree. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 27-14-506.
Employer's injury report; penalty for failure to report.

When an injury is reported by any employee, the employer shall file an employer’s injury report with the division within ten (10) days after the date on which the employer is notified of the injury and he shall mail or deliver a copy of the report to the employee. The employer’s injury report shall be certified and shall contain any information provided by rules and regulations adopted by the director. The employer shall state on the injury report that either the injury is:

Compensable and under the jurisdiction of this act; or

Not compensable under this act and the reasons therefor.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

Willful failure or gross negligence to report occurrences causing injury to any of his employees by an employer is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, §§ 1, 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Employer's report.

In a workers' compensation case, the Wyoming Office of Administrative
Hearings had subject matter jurisdiction to hold a contested hearing
because an employer was the appropriate party to the action; the term
“person” was broadly defined and included individuals doing business
under a trade name. An interested party properly objected to the final
determination of compensability, and an argument that no valid employer
submitted a valid injury report was rejected.
Heikkila v. Signal Mt. Lodge, 2013 WY 23, 295 P.3d 844,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2013).

“Filing” of injury report not satisfied by telephoning. —

Telephonic communications between the parties and the clerk of the court do not satisfy the statutory requirement for “filing.” Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 660 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1983).

Employer's failure to file timely report not fraud or misrepresentation.—

Where there was no evidence of fraud on the employer's part, or that employer provided incorrect information to injured worker concerning worker's compensation coverage, employer's failure to timely file an injury report, in and of itself, did not rise to the level of fraud or misrepresentation necessary to invoke equitable estoppel; employer and worker's compensation division were therefore not prevented from asserting statute of limitations as a defense. Mitchell v. State Rec. Comm'n Snowmobile Trails, 968 P.2d 37,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1998).

Admissibility into evidence. —

Report filed by employer, concerning accident and injury suffered thereby, is ordinarily admissible in evidence. Ideal Bakery v. Schryver, 43 Wyo. 108, 299 P. 284,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1931).

The claim and reports in compensation cases take the place of pleadings and should be liberally construed. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co. v. Harvey, 52 Wyo. 349, 75 P.2d 1,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1938).

§ 27-14-507.
Employer required to post notice.

Each employer shall keep posted in a conspicuous place for employees a notice which shall be furnished by the division and which shall contain a brief summary of this act and procedures for filing claims. Each employer shall also keep a copy of this act and have it available for all employees.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Worker's Compensation Div. v. Barker, 978 P.2d 1156,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-14-508.
Blank form supplied by director; instructions to employees, employers and health care providers; training programs for clerks of court.

The director shall:

Prepare, print and supply free of charge any blank forms necessary in administering this act to be used insofar as possible in all procedures under this act;

Prepare and print instructions for making correct claims for the information and use of employees;

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

Prepare and print instructions for proper claim procedures for the information and use of health care providers and providers of medical and hospital care;

Prepare and print instructions for proper claim procedures including approving or objecting to claims for the information and use of employers.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-509.
Autopsy may be required; procedure.

Upon the filing of a claim for compensation for death for which an autopsy is necessary to accurately and scientifically ascertain and determine the cause of death, a hearing examiner may order an autopsy. The hearing examiner may designate a licensed physician who is a specialist in autopsies to perform or attend the autopsy and to certify his findings. The autopsy findings are a public record and shall be filed with the division. The hearing examiner may exercise the authority on his own motion or on an application made to him at any time by any party in interest upon the presentation of facts showing that a controversy may exist in regard to the cause of death or the existence of any compensable injury. All proceedings for compensation shall be suspended upon refusal of a claimant or his representative to permit an autopsy when ordered and no compensation shall be payable during the continuance of the refusal.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

§ 27-14-510.
Misrepresentations or false statements; failure of employer to establish account or furnish payroll report.

Any person who knowingly makes, authorizes or permits any misrepresentation or false statement to be made for the purpose of him or another person receiving payment of any kind under this act is guilty of:

A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, if the value of the payment is less than five hundred dollars ($500.00);

A felony punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both, if the value of the payment is five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more.

Any employer who knowingly makes a false statement in a payroll report or reports resulting in the avoidance of or reduction in the employer’s premium obligation within a one (1) year period is guilty of:

A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, if the avoided premium or reduction in premium is less than five hundred dollars ($500.00); or

A felony punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both, if the avoided premium or reduction in premium is five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more.

Any employer who knowingly makes a false statement in an injury report with the intention of denying a worker benefits due under this act is guilty of:

A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, if the value of the benefits is less than five hundred dollars ($500.00);

A felony punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both, if the value of the benefits is five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more.

Any employer who knowingly fails to establish an account or knowingly fails to furnish a payroll report as required by this act is guilty of:

A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, for a first conviction; or

A felony punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or both, for a second or subsequent conviction.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1993, ch. 176, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Self-incrimination privilege. —

Employee properly asserted the privilege against self-incrimination in workers' compensation proceedings, in response to discovery requests, because the employee gave a reasoned explanation for invoking the privilege, as the employee reasonably believed the employee's discovery responses could be used in a criminal prosecution under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-510(a). Debyah v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2015 WY 94, 353 P.3d 711,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2015).

Misrepresentation in obtaining employment. —

Workers' compensation
benefits were properly awarded to an injured employee who was determined
to be an alien not authorized to be in or work in the United States
because the employer reasonably believed, based on documentation and
information provided, that the employee was authorized to work in
the United States, even though this was later found to be false. Moreover,
the employee did not misrepresent the facts of his injury to receive
benefits, and there was no reasonable nexus between the misrepresentations
he made to gain employment and his application for benefits for the
work-related injury he subsequently suffered. L & L Enters. v. Arellano (In re Arellano), 2015 WY 21, 344 P.3d 249,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2015).

Cited

in

Sims v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 872 P.2d 555,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 27-14-511.
Recovery of benefits paid by mistake or fraud.

The attorney general may bring a civil action to recover the value of any benefits or other monies paid under this act due to mistake, misrepresentation or fraud. The attorney general shall be entitled to recover the costs of suit and reasonable attorney fees in cases of misrepresentation or fraud. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a criminal prosecution where appropriate. Any civil action for recovery of overpayment resulting from a mistake by the division shall be commenced within one (1) year after the alleged overpayment and shall be limited to recovery of those mistaken payments made within twelve (12) months before the commencement of the action.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 131, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Eligibility for workers' compensation as affected by claimant's misrepresentation of health or physical condition at time of hiring, 12 ALR5th 658.